Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.240

Intercepting, transmitting, or recording conversations concerning controlled substances—Concurrent power of attorney general to investigate and prosecute.

(1) The attorney general shall have concurrent authority and power with the prosecuting attorneys to investigate violations of RCW 9.73.200 through 9.73.230 or RCW 9.73.090 and initiate and conduct prosecutions of any violations upon request of any of the following:

(a) The person who was the nonconsenting party to the intercepted, transmitted, or recorded conversation or communication; or

(b) The county prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which the offense has occurred.

(2) The request shall be communicated in writing to the attorney general.

[ 1989 c 271 s 206.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.